Nevada, session 83, SB83.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Money to carry out the Environmental
Improvement Program for the Lake Tahoe Basin established
pursuant to section 1 of chapter 514, Statutes of Nevada 1999, at
page 2627, must be provided by the issuance by the State Board of
Finance of general obligation bonds of the State of Nevada in a total
face amount of not more than $10,500,000 pursuant to NRS 349.150
to 349.364, inclusive. The proceeds of the bonds issued pursuant to
this section and any accrued interest thereon must be deposited in
the Fund to Protect the Lake Tahoe Basin created pursuant to
section 2 of chapter 514, Statutes of Nevada 1999, at page 2628,
and, except as otherwise provided in section 2 of this act, must be
used for the following activities related to the Environmental
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
Improvement Program to be carried out by the State Department of
Conservation and Natural Resources:
1. Continued implementation of forest health, restoration and
fuels management projects;
2. Control and prevention of invasive terrestrial and aquatic
species;
3. Enhancement of recreational opportunities;
4. Protection of sensitive species and improvement of wildlife
habitat; and
5. Water quality, erosion control and stream restoration and
enhancement projects of the Environmental Improvement Program
to be carried out pursuant to grants and project agreements.
Sec. 2. The Division of State Lands of the State Department of
Conservation and Natural Resources may use money authorized
pursuant to section 1 of this act for an activity other than an activity
listed in section 1 of this act if the Interim Finance Committee
approves such a use in writing before the Division of State Lands
engages in the activity.
Sec. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that the issuance of
securities and the incurrence of indebtedness pursuant to section 1
of this act:
1. Are necessary for the protection and preservation of the
natural resources of this State and for the purpose of obtaining the
benefits thereof; and
2. Constitute an exercise of the authority conferred by the
second paragraph of Section 3 of Article 9 of the Constitution of the
State of Nevada.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)